District of Columbia statutes.
19-1309.06

Language invoking standard of subchapter.

The following terms or comparable language in a trust instrument, unless otherwise limited or modified by the instrument, authorizes any investment or strategy permitted under this subchapter: “investments permissible by law for investment of trust funds”, “legal investments”, “authorized investments”, “using the judgment and care under the circumstances then prevailing that persons of prudence, discretion, and intelligence exercise in the management of their own affairs, not in regard to speculation but in regard to the permanent disposition of their funds, considering the probable income as well as the probable safety of their capital”, “prudent man rule”, “prudent trustee rule”, “prudent person rule”, and “prudent investor rule”.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208